test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pois_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pȯis: # Noun 109 'eng /est poiss/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯis+N+Sg+Nom: pȯis
     pȯis+N+Sg+Gen: pȯis
     pȯis+N+Sg+Par: pȯisõ
     pȯis+N+Sg+Dat: pȯisõn
     pȯis+N+Sg+Ins: pȯisõks
     pȯis+N+Sg+Ill: pȯisõ
     pȯis+N+Sg+Ela: pȯisõst
     pȯis+N+Pl+Nom: pūošõd
     pȯis+N+Pl+Gen: pūošõd
     pȯis+N+Pl+Par: pūošidi
     pȯis+N+Pl+Dat: pūošõdõn
     pȯis+N+Pl+Ins: pūošõdõks
     pȯis+N+Pl+Ill: pūošiz
     pȯis+N+Pl+Ela: pūošist
